Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2714.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-18303, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-18303. Auction and sale of land held by state under tax deed; disposition of proceeds A. After advertisement, pursuant to section 42-18302, the board of supervisors may sell the real property in the county held by the state by tax deed to the highest bidder for cash except as provided in subsections E, F and G of this section. The property may also be posted on the treasurer's website.  The sale may include a live auction or an online bidding process in which the board receives bids electronically over the internet in a real-time, competitive bidding event. B. On selling the property, the board of supervisors shall execute and deliver to the purchaser, at the purchaser's cost, a deed conveying the title of the state in and to the parcel purchased. The deed shall be acknowledged by the chairman and clerk of the board. C. The purchase money shall be paid to the county treasurer. After deducting and distributing interest, penalties, fees and costs charged against the parcel, the treasurer shall apportion monies to the funds of the various taxing authorities in proportion to their current share of the taxes charged against real property. Any balance remaining with the treasurer after payment of the taxes, interest, penalties, fees and costs shall be paid to the owner of the property who was dispossessed by the sale. D. If the property is not sold before the time for the next succeeding notice of sale, the board of supervisors may omit it from the notice. E. The board of supervisors may accept an offer from, and sell real property held by this state by tax deed to, the county or a city, town or special taxing district in the county for a public purpose related to affordable housing for low-income persons and families as determined by the United States department of housing and urban development, transportation or flood control.  The board of supervisors shall convey the deed and apportion the monies received in the transaction in the manner prescribed by this section. If a county, city, town or special taxing district acquires real property pursuant to this subsection for purposes related to affordable housing for low-income persons and families as determined by the United States department of housing and urban development and determines that use is in the county's, city's, town's or special taxing district's best interest, the county, city, town or special taxing district may sell, lease, exchange, quitclaim, convey or otherwise dispose of the real property or interest in the real property for less than fair market value and without holding a public auction to provide the affordable housing if a regulatory agreement is recorded in the office of the county recorder in which the affordable housing is located that contains covenants and conditions that require the dwelling units provided for low-income persons and families under this subsection to remain continually affordable to low-income persons and families for the longest feasible time, but not less than thirty years. F. The board of supervisors may sell real property in the county held by the state by tax deed to the owner of contiguous real property that is used for commercial, agricultural or residential purposes, and the board may accept an offer by the contiguous owner to purchase the property, if all of the following conditions apply: 1. Both the property offered for sale and the contiguous property were at one time under common ownership. If there is more than one contiguous property owner offering to purchase the property, the board shall accept the offer from the contiguous property owner that demonstrates that the owner's contiguous property was most recently under common ownership with the property offered for sale. 2. The property offered for sale cannot be separately used for commercial, agricultural or residential purposes, as applicable, pursuant to applicable building codes and ordinances of the jurisdiction in which the property is located due to its size or configuration. 3. The contiguous property owner agrees to submit a request to the county assessor to jointly assess the contiguous properties pursuant to section 42-15058. G. The board of supervisors may sell real property in the county held by the state by tax deed to a homeowners' association if the real property is part of a common area maintained by the homeowners' association as determined by the county assessor. H. If an offer under subsection E, F or G of this section is pending at the time of the auction under this section, the board of supervisors shall remove the property from the auction. I. The board of supervisors may establish procedures for accepting monetary offers and sell real property in the county held by the state by tax deed over the counter if the real property is not eligible for sale under subsection E, F or G of this section and was offered for sale and not sold at the auction held pursuant to subsection a of this section. J. The board of supervisors may establish procedures for accepting monetary offers under subsection f of this section. END_STATUTE